Utah statutes.
26-38-2.6.   Temporary exemption for certain restrictions on the use of e-cigarettes.

(1)  The prohibition against the use of an e-cigarette in a place of public access does not apply if:

(a)  the use of the e-cigarette occurs in the place of public access that is a retail establishment that sells e-cigarettes and the use is for the purpose of:

(i)  the retailer of an e-cigarette demonstrating to the purchaser of the e-cigarette how to use the e-cigarette; or

(ii)  the customer sampling a product sold by the retailer for use in an e-cigarette; and

(b)  the retailer of e-cigarettes:

(i)  has all required licenses for the possession and sale of e-cigarettes in a place of business;

(ii)  does not permit a person under the age of 19 to enter any part of the premises of the retail establishment in which the e-cigarettes are sold; and

(iii)  the sale of e-cigarettes and substances for use in e-cigarettes constitutes at least 75% of the establishment's gross sales.

(2)  This section does not require a county or municipality to issue a license to a person to sell e-cigarettes.

(3)  This section sunsets in accordance with Section 63I-1-226.



Enacted by Chapter 171, 2012 General Session

